





          
         
            
  
              

      
     
    
   
   



equation section        

         






 SU  
 SO  
 Sp  
 Spin  
 so  
 su  
 sp  
 spin  


 tr 
 Tr 
 diag 
 ch 
 c 

 Re 
 Im 

 vol 









  

  
  






    






 

 
QMUL-PH-03-01

hep-th/0302158


 

Superstrings with Intrinsic Torsion 

Jerome P. Gauntlett, Dario Martelli and Daniel
Waldram 

Department of Physics
 Queen Mary, University of London

  Mile End Rd, London E1 4NS, U.K.   


 
Abstract 

 
We systematically analyse the necessary and sufficient conditions for
the preservation of supersymmetry for bosonic geometries of the 
form , in the common NS-NS sector of 
type II string theory and also type I/heterotic string theory. 
The results are phrased in terms of the intrinsic torsion of -structures
and provide a comprehensive classification of static supersymmetric
backgrounds in these theories. 
Generalised calibrations naturally appear since the 
geometries always admit NS or type I/heterotic 
fivebranes wrapping calibrated cycles.
Some new solutions are presented. In particular we
find  examples with a fibred structure which preserve 
supersymmetry in type II and include compact type I/heterotic geometries. 



width 5.cm  E-mail: j.p.gauntlett@qmul.ac.uk 

 E-mail: d.martelli@qmul.ac.uk 

 E-mail: d.j.waldram@qmul.ac.uk 





Introduction 



Supersymmetric backgrounds of string/M-theory 
with non-vanishing fluxes are currently
an active area of study for at least two reasons. Firstly,
they provide a framework for searching for new models with
attractive phenomenology
and secondly, they appear in generalisations of
the AdS/CFT correspondence. For both applications
a detailed mathematical understanding of the kinds of geometry that 
can arise is important for further elucidating physical results. 
Such an understanding can also lead to 
new methods for constructing explicit examples.

Here we will analyse supersymmetric geometries of the
common NS-NS sector of type IIA and IIB supergravity. That is, we
consider non-vanishing dilaton  and three-form  but with all
R-R fields and fermions set to zero. The closely related
type I and heterotic geometries which allow in addition non-trivial
gauge fields will also be considered. Let us introduce the basic
conditions. A type II geometry will preserve supersymmetry if and only if
there is at least one  or  satisfying 

 

where for type IIB (respectively IIA)  are two Majorana-Weyl
spinors of  of the same (respectively opposite)
chirality and  is the Levi-Civita connection. Geometrically
 are connections with totally anti-symmetric torsion given
by . Locally the three-form is given by  and
hence satisfies the Bianchi identity

 

For heterotic/type I string theory, the bosonic field content also
includes a gauge field , with field strength , in the adjoint of
 or . We choose conventions where a
geometry preserves supersymmetry if there is at least one spinor
 satisfying susy  and, in addition, the gaugino
variation vanishes, 

^MN  F_MN ^+=0 .

The Bianchi identity reads

H = 2FF - RR)

where the second term on the right hand side is the leading string
correction to the supergravity expression. The equations of motion for
these conventions can be found in Appendix .

The geometries we consider here will be of the form
, and hence with  only non-vanishing
on . When  the analysis covers the most general static
geometries. As is well known, for the special case when
, the necessary and sufficient conditions for
preservation of supersymmetry is that  admits at least one
covariantly constant spinor and hence has special holonomy. Apart from
the trivial  case of flat space this gives rise to the possibilities
presented in figure . These manifolds are all Ricci-flat and
hence they automatically also
solve the supergravity equations of motion(Note that there 
are also higher order corrections to the equations of motion
that give rise to tadpoles for type IIA in  and IIB in  (via
-theory).  The tadpoles can often be
cancelled by the addition of spacetime filling strings or D3-branes,
respectively. For simplicity we shall not explicitly refer to
these corrections further here and refer to for further
discussion.) . Note that figure  only presents the minimal
"canonical" dimension  of the manifold in order for it to have the
corresponding special holonomy. It is also possible to have manifolds of
higher dimension with the same
special holonomy group: when
 the resulting geometries are
simply direct products of special holonomy manifolds in the canonical 
dimensions given in figure  with one or more flat directions.

 [!th]
* 
Special holonomies of manifolds in  -dimensions
with covariantly constant spinors with respect to either the 
Levi-Civita connection or a connection with totally anti-symmetric 
torsion . Only the minimal "canonical" dimension  is presented.
The arrows represent the different ways the groups can 
be embedded in each other. 


The analysis of a set of necessary and sufficient conditions
for the preservation of supersymmetry in certain cases where 
and  are non-zero was initiated some time ago in
 (see also). 
In general, from the first condition in susy , 
it is necessary that there is at least one spinor
which is covariantly constant with respect to one of the connections
 with totally anti-symmetric torsion,  say. 
This is equivalent to requiring that  has holonomy given
by one of the groups in
figure . As we discuss in more detail below this
implies the existence of various invariant forms on  satisfying
certain differential constraints. The second equation
in susy  then imposes additional conditions on the
forms. Finally, one shows that the existence of such a set of forms
with constraints is in fact sufficient for the existence of one or
more solutions to the supersymmetry conditions susy .  

It is also important to know what extra conditions
are required in order that the geometry solves the equations of motion.
By analysing the integrability conditions of susy , 
it was proved in  for the entire class of 
geometries under consideration, that it is only necessary to impose
the Bianchi identity bianchi . Note, it was actually shown that one
needs to impose the Bianchi identity for  and the  equation of
motion. However, the expression for  implied by supersymmetry, to
be discussed below and given in exp , implies that the  equation
of motion is automatically satisfied so only the Bianchi identity is
required. 

Recently it has been appreciated that the necessary and sufficient
conditions derived in, which just analysed
the  cases in , can also be phrased in terms of 
-structures, and this has allowed a number of 
generalisations. Similar ideas have been used to analyse other
supergravity solutions in
. 
The invariant forms on  define the -structure, while the
differential conditions correspond to restricting the class of the
intrinsic torsion of the -structure. We will briefly review some
aspects of -structures later, but we refer to, e.g.,  for
further details.  The necessary and sufficient conditions for the
 in 
 and in
 cases have also been analysed from this point of
view. Thus, when only , say, has special holonomy , we
now have a fairly complete set of results, assuming that  has the
canonical dimension for  as given in figure . We shall
review all known cases including the results of
. Note the  case was also recently reviewed
in detail from the new perspective of intrinsic torsion
in . One new result of this paper will be to analyse
the remaining two cases in  when  has holonomy 
or .  

One can also ask what happens when  does not have
the canonical dimension for . For example, we might consider
geometries of the form , with 
admitting two Killing spinors leading to  having
an  structure corresponding to  having
 holonomy. In the case that , as already
noted, this would necessarily imply that  is a direct
product of a flat direction with a Calabi-Yau three-fold.
When , however, we will show that the geometries
can be more general than simply the direct product of a flat direction
with a six manifold  with  structure of the type derived
in .
In particular, the flat direction can be non-trivially fibred
over  with the fibration determined by an Abelian 
 instanton (i.e. a holomorphic gauge field satisfying the
Donaldson-Uhlenbeck-Yau equation). 

More generally, we will determine the most general static
supersymmetric geometries of the form  preserving
any number of Killing spinors . If there is one Killing spinor the
geometry will have a structure but now in . Additional
Killing spinors lead to additional structures or equivalently a
-structure where  is the maximal common subgroup of them
embedded in . The -structures that arise are still given by
the groups  as in figure  but now in .
We will show that the most general geometries consist of a number of
flat directions non-trivially fibred over manifolds  that possess
-structures in the canonical dimension. The fibration is determined
by Abelian generalised -instantons on . 

Another purpose of this paper is to present the new and the known
results in a uniform way. In particular, as emphasised in 
, the
expression for the three-form can always be expressed in terms of the
-structure in a way related to "generalised
calibrations". 
Specifically we always have an expression of the form 

 

where  is an invariant form which specifies, at least partially, 
the -structure. Generalised calibrations extend the original
definition of a calibration form to cases where the background has
non-vanishing fluxes. In particular a generalised calibration form,
here , is no longer closed and its exterior derivative is related
to the flux, here  (and the dilaton )
as in exp . The physical significance of
generalised calibrated cycles is that they minimise the energy
functional of a brane wrapping the cycle in the presence of the
fluxes. 

The reason that exp  might have been anticipated is as follows.  
First one notes that the type of geometries under discussion arise as
solutions describing NS fivebranes wrapping supersymmetric cycles in
manifolds of special holonomy including the full back-reaction of the
brane on the geometry. To see this first recall that the geometry of
an unwrapped NS fivebrane is a product of  along the
world-volume of the fivebrane with a transverse four-dimensional space
with non-vanishing  and . In addition, we know that a probe 
fivebrane with world-volume  will be
supersymmetric if  is a calibrated -cycle in some special
holonomy background. When we go beyond the probe approximation and
consider the back reaction of the fivebrane on the geometry, we thus expect a
geometry of the form  with non-vanishing
 and . This is precisely the type of geometry we are
considering. Now, on physical grounds, we know that we can always add
a second probe brane without breaking supersymmetry provided it is
wrapping a cycle calibrated by the same calibration form  as the
original probe brane. This implies that as we switch on the back
reaction,  should still be a calibrating form, though now, since
 and  are non-zero, it is a generalised calibration. In other
words, if the original probe brane wraps a cycle calibrated by a
calibration form , the final geometry  should admit the
corresponding generalised calibration form, that is 
satisfying exp .  

In table  we have listed for each of the different holonomies
of , in the canonical dimensions,
the corresponding type of calibrated cycle
that a NS-fivebrane wraps in order to give the geometry. We have also
included the number of minimal  spinors preserved in 
each case. Note that for the  and  cases we have listed the 
six- and two-dimensional chirality of the preserved
supersymmetry. Also  corresponds to a Calabi-Yau -fold and
 to a hyper-manifold in .

 [!th]
 
 
-structures when  has special holonomy. 


It is interesting to note that the more general geometries in 
mentioned above, with a number of flat directions fibred
over , have a fascinating interpretation in this regard.
In particular, the flat directions correspond to directions along 
the world-volume of the fivebrane wrapping a flat direction, 
and so it is surprising that supersymmetry does not require the 
fibration to be trivial. Note that this interpretation is mirrored in
the refined version of exp  for the flux that one obtains in : 

 

where ,  (partly) determine the -structure, with 
one forms corresponding to the flat directions of the fivebrane.


Although the above discussion was based on physical considerations of
wrapped NS fivebrane solutions, 
it is a mathematical fact that the geometries all
satisfy conditions of the form exp . The generality of the
result gives a simple but powerful vanishing theorem for all cases
 (this simplifies and extends(Note that
 also obtained results for the  case when .) 
an earlier vanishing theorem that was given for the  cases only in 
). 
In particular there are no compact geometries in the type II case (or the
heterotic/type I case if ). The proof is in one line: 

 

where we have integrated by parts in the last step. Since the left
hand side is positive semi-definite we conclude that  and it then
follows from susy  that  is constant. 

Until this point the discussion has focused on geometries admitting
one or more Killing spinors of the same type, , say.
This covers all static cases of the type I/heterotic theories.
However, for the type II theories when  and  are non-zero,
there are solutions to susy  for both  and
, if both connections  and 
have special holonomy. This means that the general classification of
supersymmetric geometries indicated in table , as well
as the generalisations to , can be refined.
In we analysed the different ways in
which probe fivebranes can wrap calibrated cycles in manifolds of
special holonomy and determined the holonomies of 
 that are expected in the corresponding supergravity solutions,
after including the back reaction. The results are summarised in 
table . In these cases,  each define a 
different structure with groups . Equivalently, together they define
a single structure with group  which is the maximal common 
subgroup of the two embedded in , and this is also listed in
table . 
 It is noteworthy that from the 
wrapped fivebrane perspective, in all cases
this minimal -structure is the same as the 
holonomy of the initial special holonomy manifold that one started
with. Since both  are required to define the -structure,
unlike the -structures, it is not covariantly constant 
with respect to a connection with totally anti-symmetric torsion.

 [!th]
 
 
-structures in type II theories when both  have
special holonomy. 


The particular class of geometries with
 each having  holonomy, with a common  subgroup was
analysed in detail in.
The necessary and sufficient conditions on the  structure
in order that the geometry preserves supersymmetry were presented. 
This case is associated with fivebranes 
wrapping SLAG three-cycles in manifolds with  holonomy. 
It was also shown that the three-form flux can be expressed as a generalised 
calibration associated with a (3,0) form, as expected for a special
Lagrangian cycle. This result again refines that of exp  in a way
expected from physical considerations.  
Here we shall extend the analysis of 
to cover all cases discussed in.

Table  lists the geometries associated with
fivebranes wrapping calibrated cycles.  Note that explicit 
solutions corresponding to three more cases were 
discussed in:  has 
holonomy, while  has ,  or  holonomy.
They correspond to fivebranes wrapping certain quaternionic planes in .
Such calibrations are linear and it is plausible that the solutions found
in are the most general kinds of solution. 
In any case, we will not consider these cases further in this paper. 


The geometries listed in table  are all
in their "canonical" dimension.
We will argue that they can be generalised to , as before,
by adding a number of flat directions.
In order that both  and  Killing spinors survive, the
fibration must be given by a generalised instanton with respect to the
common -structure. 

It is natural to wonder if supersymmetric geometries admitting
both  and  Killing spinors are necessarily of the type 
given in table . We shall present an interesting explicit
example in  which shows that this is not the case. The example is
a torus  non-trivially fibred over a flat  base with
non-vanishing dilaton. For a particular carefully chosen fibration we
show that  has  holonomy while  has 
holonomy. This solution thus preserves twelve supercharges which
corresponds to  supersymmetry in the remaining  four spacetime
dimensions.  It would be interesting to see how it is related to the
type IIB solutions preserving the same amount of supersymmetry with
both R-R and NS-NS fluxes presented in. 

In this paper we will not explicitly present many detailed proofs
since the arguments follow the same lines as those
in, and also because
we do not want to obscure the main results. 
The plan of the rest of the paper
is as follows. In section  we review
-structures and their intrinsic torsion. In
section  we discuss the geometries summarised in
table . We also comment on the additional constraints
arising in type I/heterotic string theory. Section analyses the general supersymmetric geometries in  when one of
the connections  has special holonomy,  which generalises
the geometries of table . In section  we
present some simple explicit  solutions of the type discussed in
section  including candidate heterotic/type I
compactifications based on fibrations over  surfaces that preserve
eight supersymmetries. Section  discusses the 
cases summarised in table  when both  and 
have special holonomy. Section  presents some further
explicit solutions in  including a type II example preserving
12 supersymmetries corresponding to  supersymmetry 
and candidate heterotic/type I compactifications based on fibrations
over  surfaces that preserve four
supersymmetries. Section  concludes with some
discussion and a summary of our main results.  




-structures in canonical dimension  



It will be useful first to recall some aspects of the classification
of -structures (for further details see e.g.). 
A manifold  admits a -structure if its
frame bundle admits a sub-bundle with fibre group . This implies
that all tensors and, when appropriate, spinors on  can be decomposed
globally into representations of . A -structure is typically
equivalent to the existence of a set of globally defined
-invariant tensors, or alternatively a set of globally defined
-invariant spinors. In particular, when  as is the
case for -invariant spinors, the structure defines a metric, since
the corresponding sub-bundle of the frame bundle can be viewed as a
set of orthonormal frames. 

The -structure is classified by the
intrinsic torsion. When  this is a measure of the
failure of the tensors/spinors to be covariantly
constant with respect to the Levi-Civita connection of the metric defined
by the structure. As a result, all of the components of the
intrinsic torsion are encoded in derivatives of the invariant
tensors/spinors. Furthermore, the intrinsic torsion, , then takes values in
 where  is the space of -forms
and  where  is the Lie algebra of . The intrinsic
torsion can then be decomposed into irreducible -modules, 
. We will denote specific components of  in 
each module  by . Only if the intrinsic torsion
completely vanishes does the manifold have -holonomy.    

For a supersymmetric background , where  is the
metric on , we need some non-trivial globally 
defined spinors satisfying susy . Note, the spinors are
globally defined since  implies they have
constant norm, which we take to be unity, , and
so are nowhere vanishing. This necessarily defines a -structure with
. The possible groups  are precisely the possible
special holonomy groups appearing in figure . The necessary
and sufficient conditions for solutions of the particular
supersymmetry constraints susy  then translate into the
-structure being of a particular type with certain components of
the intrinsic torsion vanishing. Since  the metric
 is completely determined by the -structure. Similarly, one
finds expressions for  and  in terms of the intrinsic
torsion of the -structure.

In this section we will summarise the definition of the structures and
how the generic intrinsic torsion is encoded in each case. We will only
consider the structures in their canonical dimensions: in ,
 in , etc. It is straightforward to generalise to the case that
the structure is in a higher dimension (for an example, see appendix E of
).
In the following sections we then turn to the particular necessary and
sufficient conditions on the structure for supersymmetry. 

-structure in   
The structure is completely specified by a real two-form  of
maximal rank and a complex -form  satisfying  

 

where  is defined using the wedge product. Together these define
a metric  and an orientation chosen as .
Raising an index on  using this metric defines an almost complex
structure satisfying . With respect to this 
almost complex structure,  is an -form while the
two-form  is of type . Furthermore the metric  is
almost Hermitian. Note that the almost complex structure is actually
determined solely by the choice of  and is independent of the
two-form . 

 For generic  structures, the intrinsic torsion decomposes into five
modules  . Consider for
instance . The adjoint representation of  decomposes as
 where  is
the adjoint representation of , and so the remaining
representations correspond to . The one-form 
representation decomposes as . We then have 

 

where the corresponding  representations of 
are given by

 

For  and  the corresponding representations are 

 

respectively. In particular, for  the modules  and
 are absent. For  note that the 
and  modules can be further decomposed into real
modules  and  as discussed in
detail in.  

Each component of the intrinsic torsion  can be
given in terms of the exterior derivative of  or , or in one
case both. Generically, we have the decompositions

 

Explicitly, since  is a -form,  has a  piece
and a  piece (plus the complex conjugates). The former 
defines an irrep of  and gives the  component of . The
latter splits into a primitive -form, i.e.
 one satisfying , giving , plus a
-form, giving , and which can be written as

 

The same expression appears in characterising any almost Hermitian
metric and is known as the Lee form (of ). Here we have introduced
the notation  which contracts a -form
 into a -form  via

 

Similarly, since
 is a -form,  has a 
piece plus a  piece. Let us first consider .
Again the former defines an irrep, which
gives  and can be written as a Lee form for either  or
equivalently  

 

The second line is obtained by noting that .
In general, the  piece of  
splits into a primitive piece 
giving  plus another piece that encodes the same  component
of  as  due to the second compatibility condition
in SUn . Note that for ,  can be defined as
the real and imaginary parts of , respectively. For ,
as noted, the classes  and  are absent. In this
case
 is still given by the first line of leep , while  is
defined by
   W_2=1 4 (      + ) .
Recall that we have -holonomy if all the components of the
intrinsic torsion vanish. In this case the manifold is
Calabi-Yau. Clearly this occurs if and only if . It
will be useful to note some two further cases. First, the almost
complex structure is integrable if and only if . 
Secondly, we note that under a conformal transformation of
the -structure, such that  and 
, which implies the metric scales as , 
 and  are invariant as is the
following combination

 

If this combination together with ,  and  all vanish and
 are exact, the manifold is conformally Calabi-Yau. 

-structures in   
The structure is specified by a -invariant Cayley four-form,
, which at any given point in  can be written as 

 

where  define a local frame and 
. The structure defines a metric
 and an orientation which we take to be
 implying . 

The adjoint representation of  decomposes under  as
, where  is the adjoint
representation of . One then finds that the intrinsic
torsion decomposes into two modules  

 

The components  of  in  are given in terms of
the exterior derivative  as, again decomposing into
 representations,  

 

In particular the  component in the  representation is
given by 

 

and is the Lee form for . The  component in the
 representation is then given by the remaining pieces of
. Note that the manifold has holonomy
only when the intrinsic torsion vanishes which is equivalent to
. In addition, under a conformal transformation we have 
 for some function , which implies that the metric
scales as . Such a transformation leaves the 
component of  invariant while the Lee-form  transforms as 
.   

Given the definition Psidef  one has a number of standard
identities, which will be useful in what follows. We have

 


-structures in   
The structure is specified by an associative three-form . In a
local frame this can be given by 

 

This defines a metric  and an orientation
. Explicitly we then have 

 


The adjoint representation of  decomposes as
 where  is the adjoint
representation of . The intrinsic torsion then decomposes into
four modules ,  

 

The components of  in each module  are encoded in
terms of  and  which decompose as 

 

Note that the  component in the  representation appears
in both  and . It is the Lee form, given by

 

The  component in the singlet representation can be
written as 

 

The remaining components of  and  encode  and
 respectively. The  manifold has  holonomy if and only if
the intrinsic torsion vanishes which is equivalent to . 
Note that under a conformal transformation  the
metric transforms as  and hence 
. Under this transformation ,  and  are
invariant, while the Lee-form transforms as . 
Finally, note that -structures of the type 
 are called integrable as one can introduce a 
Dolbeault cohomology.

Again there are a number of useful identities given the
definition g2form . We have

 

while

 

and

 



-structures in  
The structure is specified by three almost complex structures 
with  satisfying the algebra

 

Together these define a metric . Lowering one index with this metric on
each almost complex structure gives a set of maximal rank two-forms
. Note that the -structure could be equally well defined
in terms of these forms. We also have a natural orientation given by
 for any . 

For  recall that  and this case has already
been considered above. We can make the correspondence by identifying
 and . In more detail, first
note that one can define nine Lee-forms 
, but for  only the diagonal Lee-forms are
independent, since  is independent of  for each
. The three classes of intrinsic torsion defined above from the
 point of view, are given by ,
 and . Note that the
almost complex structure  is integrable if and only if
 and similarly for  and . 

The only other case of interest in the context of this paper
is . The adjoint representation of
 decomposes under  as
, where  is the
adjoint representation of . One then finds that the
intrinsic torsion decomposes into 9 different  modules 

 

where the notation takes into account that while the torsion is real,
the representations
 and  are pseudo-real. One can show that all 
the components of  in  are
specified in terms of the exterior derivatives . 
Thus the  manifold has  holonomy if and
only if . In this case six of the nine Lee forms
 are linearly independent (this is
actually true for any -structure), and these precisely
correspond to the six   representations appearing
in sp2decomp . To be more precise, one can show that

 

and hence six independent Lee-forms are given by , 
and  and ,  and
. (Note that similar definitions of the independent
Lee forms in the case of almost quaternionic manifolds are given
in .) One also notes the relation 
*(J^AJ^BJ^C)=J^AL^BC  + J^BL^AC  .
Finally in later calculations we found it useful to determine the
relationships between the ten six-forms .
A general six-form, which is Hodge-dual to a two-form,
corresponds to the  representations in the
decomposition 
. As the six-forms of interest are
constructed from -singlets, they must correspond to
the three singlets in the decomposition, and hence there
must be seven relationships amongst the ten six-forms. They are
given by

 


-structures in  
The structure is defined by a pair of orthogonal
-structures which we can write as two triplets of almost
complex structures  satisfying  

 

Again these define a metric. Lowering one index on the almost complex
structures gives six half-maximal rank two-forms. We also have a
natural eight-dimensional orientation given by  where
 and  for any  and
. 


Following the usual prescription decomposing the adjoint
representation of  into  representations
to give  one finds 28 different real
modules: 

 

Since the -structures are orthogonal, we necessarily have an
almost product structure . This is a tensor 
satisfying . It can be written in terms of the
complex structure as  for any 
and . This can be written as the product of two commuting almost
complex structures . As discussed in
appendix , generically the almost product structure
is not integrable.  




Geometries with  Killing spinors in canonical
  dimension  



We now consider generic supersymmetric type II geometries 
 when only one of the connections  
has special holonomy. 
For definiteness we choose it to be . The different possible
holonomies are the usual groups given in figure . In this section
we will only consider geometries with  having special
holonomy in its minimal canonical dimension: the cases
are listed in table . Our aim is to summarise the known cases
in a uniform way as well as to present new results on the two
remaining cases,  and . At the end
of the section we will also discuss the generalisations needed 
for the heterotic/type I string theories. 

The basic technique to derive the results of this and subsequent sections
is to construct tensors from bi-linears in the Killing spinor , which
characterise the structure. Differential constraints on the structure
are obtained from the vanishing of the dilatino and gravitino variations.
The expression for the three-form  as a generalised calibration, that
we are emphasising, can easily be obtained using the method of 
. We will not present any details of these
calculations in this section, for reasons of clarity. Note, however, that the
next section will contain some representative calculations.

-geometries in  
We start with the case where  has  holonomy in
 first considered in the case of heterotic/type I theories
in . The necessary and sufficient conditions for
preservation of supersymmetry are that the manifold  has an
 structure satisfying the differential 
conditions 

 

with the flux given in terms of the structure, in each case, by 

 

Note that here and throughout the paper the Hodge star is
defined with respect to the canonical orientation fixed by the
structure. For  this is . In terms of Killing
spinors, the geometries preserve two complex chiral  spinors
related by complex conjugation. For  both spinors have the same
chirality, while for  they have opposite chirality. Our
conventions for defining the spinors, ,  and  are
given in Appendix . 

These conditions on  and  are equivalent to those
in  (after setting the gauge field to zero). In
particular, as we discuss below, they imply that  is integrable. As
a result, the expression for  can be rewritten in the form, as 
given in ,

 

where . (Note that this corrects a sign
in the corresponding expression in .(To see
  this one must take into account that our convention for the
  definition of  has the opposite sign (and a factor of two) to that
  in .) ) However, it is the form sunflux  that
naturally generalises to other cases.

In particular we note that the expression for the three-form flux is
that of a generalised calibration. This is physically reasonable
since we expect geometries with flux should arise as solutions
describing fivebranes wrapping supersymmetric cycles, as discussed in
detail in. For instance, in
the  case, geometries with non-zero flux  with 
having -holonomy correspond to a fivebrane wrapped on a four-cycle in a Calabi-Yau four-fold. Such branes are calibrated by
 which is precisely the generalised calibration
appearing in the expression for . Similarly, the 
geometries correspond to fivebranes wrapping two-cycles in 
three-folds which are calibrated by . The solutions found in
 are of this type (see
 for an explicit discussion). 
Finally the slightly degenerate  case corresponds to a
fivebrane wrapping a point in a  two-fold, i.e., the fivebrane is
transverse to the . Such configurations are calibrated by the
unit function.

The conditions on the  structure SUncond  can be rephrased
in terms of the classification of intrinsic torsion. The first
condition in SUncond  implies that , and hence the almost complex
structure is in fact integrable  (as pointed out in ).
Thus for  and  the intrinsic torsion lies in
. For ,
since  and  are always absent, we have
. In all cases the second
condition in SUncond  is equivalent to the statement that
the Lee-form is exact and related to , namely . The
first condition also implies that Lee form for  is similarly
proportional to  with . For , 
this was first noticed in .

Note that this relation implies that under a conformal transformation,
the invariant combination confinv  is proportional to
. Thus only when  is it possible to have 
geometries that are conformal to Calabi-Yau -folds, as noticed by
. In this case  with . The
general form of these geometries in ten dimensions is thus given by 

 

with  given as in sunflux  and  the metric on
. This is is just the usual fivebrane solution transverse to
. The possibility of conformally  geometries was
considered in but here we claim the stronger result
that it is in fact necessary.   

It is worth emphasising that if  then
the leading order equations of motion imply  and in addition
 for the heterotic/type I case (see for
example Phieom ). Thus, for instance, the solutions 
presented in based on the Iwasawa manifold, although
supersymmetric, do not solve the leading order equations of
motion.  In general, solutions with , and  non-constant
must have  and . Similar comments apply to other
cases considered below.  

in   
Now consider the case when  has holonomy.
The only condition on the structure is that the Lee-form is
again exact
 

with flux given by
 

These geometries preserve a single chiral spinor of .
As in the  case we can understand these geometries and
conditions in terms of wrapped branes. They arise as solutions for fivebranes
wrapping Cayley four-cycles in manifolds with holonomy and the
expression for  indeed corresponds to a generalised calibration for
such a cycle. 

It is interesting to note that if we perform a conformal transformation
, then the corresponding
-structure defining  has vanishing Lee-form, and 
hence has intrinsic torsion just in the class  . 
One might entertain the idea of solutions that are conformal to a
holonomy manifold, i.e. with   having holonomy. While such a geometry, with non-vanishing flux, certainly
admits Killing spinors, we cannot solve the Bianchi identity 
with non-zero flux. To see this observe that the geometry has 
the form

 

The expression for  contains both the  and 
representations of . The singlet is proportional to
 while the  corresponds to the
trace-free part of  .
We thus conclude
that  implies that  which in turn
implies . 


-geometries in  
Next consider the case when  has  holonomy. These geometries
preserve a single  spinor. The
necessary conditions were derived
in  
and sufficiency was proved in .
This case was discussed in detail from the point of view of this
paper in . The conditions placed on the
 structure are given by 

 

which means that the intrinsic torsion lies in
 in the representations
. Moreover it implies that the Lee form is again
exact with . The flux is given by 
 

It is worth noting that these geometries are special cases of
integrable -structures in which one can introduce
a  Dolbeault cohomology .

These backgrounds arise
as solutions describing fivebranes wrapped on associative three-cycles in
manifolds of  holonomy. This is reflected in the expression for
the flux which is the condition on a generalised calibration for such
a cycle. Solutions of this type were presented
in  
(see  for an explicit demonstration
of ).  

If we perform a conformal transformation ,
then the corresponding -structure has vanishing Lee-form, and 
hence has intrinsic torsion just in the class
 .  In particular one can
consider an ansatz for solutions that are conformal to a
-holonomy manifold: 

 

However, as in the case, confspin7 , the Bianchi identity 
implies that  is constant and hence .



-geometries in  
Next consider the case when  has  holonomy.
Such geometries are examples of manifolds known as hyper-Kahler 
with torsion. A discussion of these geometries can be found, 
for example, in  and also . The dilaton
further constrains the geometry in the following way. The conditions
on the structure are given by those for the  case for each
complex structure 

 

with the flux being given by

 

These geometries preserve three chiral  spinors with the same
chirality.
The conditions sp2cond  imply that the parts of  transforming
in the two 16 's are independent of . In addition the 12 4 's
are determined by the dilaton. The "diagonal" Lee-forms
are all equal  and hence the off
diagonal Lee-forms ,  are anti-symmetric with
,  and 
.


It is worth noting that this case arises when fivebranes
wrap quaternionic planes in , that is cycles that are complex
with respect to all three complex structures. It was shown in
 that these are linear. In solutions were
written down for these configurations and it is plausible that
they are the most general, once the Bianchi identity is imposed. 


-geometries in  
Finally consider the case when  has 
holonomy. The conditions on the structure are

 

where, e.g.,  for each ,
while the flux is given by

 


These geometries preserve four chiral  spinors, all with the same 
chirality. As discussed in Appendix , the almost
product structure defined by  is
not integrable. This is because the mixed components  and ,
using the notation of Appendix , are generically
non-zero. A notable subclass of solutions, with integrable products,
is given by those corresponding to two orthogonal fivebranes
intersecting in a string, one brane wrapping  and the other
 in . Such solutions are discussed for
instance in .   

Let us now consider the modifications required for
heterotic/type I string theory. In addition to 
, the bosonic field content also includes a gauge field , 
with field strength , in the adjoint of  or .
In order to preserve supersymmetry we require the expressions 
in susy  for  only, and thus the cases described in table and the above discussion 
are equally applicable to the heterotic/type I theories.
In addition, preservation of supersymmetry requires 
the vanishing of the gaugino variation gaugino 
^MN  F_MN ^+=0 .
 For each case in table , 
since  is a singlet of the special holonomy group  of 
this is satisfied, breaking no further supersymmetry, if the
two-form , considered as the adjoint of , 
lies within the adjoint of .

 For the case we therefore need to consider  to be a instanton satisfying

 

while for  we need

 

 For the  cases, we require

 

which, in complex coordinates, is equivalent to

 

That is we need a holomorphic gauge field on a holomorphic vector bundle
satisfying the Donaldson-Uhlenbeck-Yau equation, as noticed in 
. For the -case we require that the gauge 
field satisfies spgfcon  for all three complex structures, or equivalently,

 

which are the same as the BPS equations of. For
, with self-dual complex structures,
the gauge fields must describe an anti-self-dual 
instanton
for each of the  structures. This can be written as

 


As shown in the equations of motion of 
type I supergravity are automatically satisfied if one imposes 
the modified Bianchi identity for 
H = 2FF .
In type I/heterotic string theory the Bianchi identity is modified by
higher order corrections 
H = 2FF - RR)
which allows solutions with  as for the type II theories.

We noted above for the case
that the ansatz confspin7  preserves Killing spinors
but does not solve the Bianchi identity , and hence the equations
of motion, for non-vanishing . It is interesting to ask whether
there are heterotic solutions solving .
Indeed, when  is flat such solutions have already been
found . Similarly heterotic solutions for 
that are conformal to flat space were found in
. It would be interesting to construct heterotic
solutions when  is conformal to a or -holonomy
manifold. 





General geometries with  Killing spinors 



In the previous section, we gave the necessary and sufficient
conditions for preservation of supersymmetry for a geometry of the
form  when  has special holonomy in
the corresponding canonical number of dimensions,  in ,
 in  and so on. An almost identical analysis unfolds for
 by taking . 
More generally one can ask for the generic static
supersymmetric background of the form  preserving some
number of supersymmetries.  In this section, we give a complete
analysis of this question when the spinors are all of the same type 
and show that in addition to recovering the results of the previous
section we find more general classes of geometries. As before, for
definiteness we take the Killing spinors to be all of the type
 satisfying . In the next section we
turn to the case where some Killing spinors satisfy
 and some .

Suppose we have  independent spinors  in 
all satisfying . In general, these define
a -structure, where  is the stabiliser group of
rotations which leave all the spinors invariant. One finds the
seven special holonomy groups given in
figure  as possibilities. Furthermore these embed in
 in the conventional way following the pattern of the
dimensional reduction. That is to say 
where  is the canonical dimension for the -structure as given in
figure . 

As usual the structures can also be defined in terms of a set of forms
which can be constructed out of the spinors. In general, these are of
the type  with . Here
 are the set of forms used to define the structure in its
canonical dimension  as described in
section . The  are a
set of  independent
one-forms required to define the additional orthogonal dimensions to
give a structure in . Thus for instance an -structure is
defined by the set  with . In a local
orthonormal frame , we can take the form  to have the
standard form Psidef  in terms of  while
 and . Thus, at any given point in , the forms
 and  define a reduction of  into
 and hence define a 
structure. The three-form  then describes a 
structure on the  subspace in the usual way. Note that the
structure always defines a metric. Using this metric we can also view
the  as vectors, which we will also denote as . 
In addition, as we will see, the inner product
 is constant for all  and  and so we normalise
 to be orthonormal.  

If the flux  is zero, we have  and  is then just
a product  where  is a
-holonomy manifold in the canonical dimension. From this point of
view, -holonomy extends trivially to nine dimensions. With flux
however, this is no longer the case. We will show that there are new
possibilities which are not simply direct products of the geometries
given in the 
previous section with flat space. We discuss the most general
case of , corresponding to one Killing spinor, 
in detail and then summarise the analogous results for the other
structure groups, corresponding to the existence of more than one
Killing spinor.  


Single Killing spinor: -structure in  

First assume we have a single Killing spinor  on , and
since , we can take . 
It is easy to show that the stability group is
. Equivalently we have the set of
-invariant forms  with  and . In a
particular basis , we can take  and  given by the
standard form Psidef  in terms of . In terms of
the spinor , we have 

 

where  are nine-dimensional gamma matrices with
. From the Killing spinor
conditions susy , as in the previous section, one derives a set
of necessary and sufficient conditions on . The condition
 simply translates into
. From the latter constraint we immediately
see, since  is totally antisymmetric, that  is a Killing vector,
and in addition that the norm of  is constant, as claimed above. In
addition one finds 

 

where we have made the generic  decomposition  

 

with . We can now introduce local
coordinates such that the metric has the canonical form of a fibration 

 

with , while  is a two-form on  and the
metric  is independent of  and admits a
-structure defined by , which may, however, at this point,
depend on . 

Now we turn to the dilatino equation. Following the discussion 
in , given the symmetry properties of the 
nine-dimensional gamma matrices, one has 

 

where  is an operator built out of gamma matrices and
 refer to the anti-commutator and
commutator respectively. By taking  with the lower
sign and  with the upper sign
in eq:commutator , one finds two constraints on
. First one has the Lee-form condition

 

and then the familiar calibration form for the flux 

 

Note that we have fixed our orientation by 
. 

If we decompose  9dflux  into  representations, consistency
with dK  requires

 

In other words,  satisfies the  instanton equation on
. As a result,  is not only a Killing vector but actually
preserves the  structure. That is, the Lie-derivative of 
the spinor  vanishes and hence the Lie derivative
of  also vanishes,   

 

which implies
similarly that . The Lee-form 
condition in spinsevenlee  can then be written 

 

where  is the exterior derivative on the eight-dimensional
space . Similarly the condition 9dflux  reduces to 

 

where  is the Hodge-star on . In other words, the 
structure  on  is independent of  and satisfies
exactly the same conditions spincond  and spinH  as in
the last section. In particular, the only constraint
on the intrinsic torsion in  is that the Lee form is
given as in spinsevenlee . By substituting back into the supersymmetry
conditions susy  it easy to see that these conditions are sufficient
for supersymmetry. We should point out that it is straightforward to
also define and characterise the intrinsic torsion of the structure directly in  but as it provides no extra information on
how to characterise the geometries we shall not present any details here. 

To summarise, the general  geometry is simply a flat direction 
fibred over a  geometry, with the fibration determined
by an Abelian instanton in . The metric is given by
9dmetric , the three-form by 9dthree , oldfluxcond  and the
dilaton by oldlee . In order to obtain a supersymmetric
solution to the equations of motion we also need to impose the
Bianchi identity for . Explicitly we get

 

where  is a instanton.

A number of further comments are in order. First, when the flux is
zero, we commented above that
the geometry is necessarily a direct product of a  holonomy manifold  with a flat direction. By contrast when the 
flux is non-zero, it is only in the special
case when , when the fibration is trivial, that the
geometries are simply the product of the  geometries
considered in the last section with a flat direction. 

Secondly, since  generates a symmetry of the full solution, 
including the spinors, we can dimensionally reduce a type II 
solution to get a supersymmetric heterotic solution in  with an Abelian
instanton  proportional to . Similarly, given a heterotic solution
 in  with an Abelian instanton , we
can oxidise it to obtain a type II solution in  with  proportional
to , a metric given by 9dmetric  and .  

Thirdly, the solutions are invariant under a -duality in the
-direction.

Finally, note that the  expression for the flux 9dflux 
is again that of a
generalised calibration. It corresponds to a NS fivebrane wrapping a 
supersymmetric five-cycle  in the product of
a manifold  with a circle, , with
 being a Cayley four-cycle. (Note one could
equally well replace the circle with a line.) The simplest way of
wrapping the fivebrane leads to a  geometry consisting of the
product of a  geometry considered in the last section with
a . The  is a flat direction on the world-volume of the
fivebrane. The analysis of this section shows that more complicated
geometries can arise leading to the world-volume direction being
fibred over the  manifold. As wrapped branes have holographic
duals, it will be interesting to determine the holographic
interpretation of this.


Multiple Killing spinors 

The case of multiple  Killing spinors is completely analogous to the
 case discussed above. As mentioned, the set of spinors
 in general define a -structure in  with
 being one of the standard special holonomy groups ,
, , ,  or .
 One way to view how these groups appear is to see
that the stability group of each  defines a
different embedding of  in . The structure group
 is then the common subgroup of this set of embedded 
groups. From this perspective, each -structure is equivalent to a
set of distinct -structures.

The structure group  is then the common subgroup of these
embeddings. Recall the structure can be defined in terms of
 where  are forms used to define the structure in its
canonical dimension  and  are  one-forms. The condition
 implies each  is Killing and we can take them
to be orthonormal. In addition, as in the
 case one can always derive as set of necessary and
sufficient conditions on  using the dilatino
constraint. One always finds the familiar calibration
condition for . Explicitly, for the cases where  one has  

 

where  is the single one-form, while for the  cases we have

 


The necessary and sufficient conditions also imply that the Killing vectors
 all commute and furthermore each preserves the underlying
-structure . This implies that the metric can be put in the
canonical fibration form    

 

where  is a -dimensional manifold and 
. Furthermore,  has  a -structure defined by 
independent of . The flux  has the related decomposition   

 

where  are two-forms on . In addition one finds a set
of constraints on the -structure  on . As in the 
case these turn out to be precisely the canonical dimension conditions
given in the last section. 

The additional freedom in nine-dimensional geometries are 
given by the two-forms
 defining the fibration. Again as in the  case
consistency between the calibration conditions calib1 
and calib2  and the expansion Hexp  implies that each
 satisfies the appropriate Abelian -instanton equation on
. 

In summary, general supersymmetric geometries in  are closely
related to the supersymmetric geometries in the canonical dimensions
discussed in the last section. They all have a fibred structure where
the base space  has a -structure in canonical dimension
satisfying one of the sets of conditions given in
section . The flux is given by a generalised
calibration condition calib1  or calib2 , corresponding
to a fivebrane wrapping a five-cycle. The twisting of the fibration is
described by two-forms  which are all Abelian -instantons on
. If one makes a dimensional reduction on the , the
solutions correspond to heterotic solutions in canonical dimension
 with  Abelian instantons. 
In order to obtain a solution to the equations of motion
the flux  on  must also satisfy a modified Bianchi identity

 


These results provide a comprehensive
classification of all the possible
supersymmetric heterotic/type I or NS-NS type II 
bosonic geometries of the form
 preserving Killing spinors satisfying
susy  for . Any solution with  can be obtained simply
by setting  of the  twists to zero, so that the fibration
becomes, at least partially, a product . 

Note that there is one possible caveat to this analysis which is the
existence of geometries with exactly five, six or seven Killing
spinors. This necessarily defines an -structure and would require the
existence of a compatible connection  without the particular
fibration structure described in the text. Similar comments apply to
the existence of solutions with nine or more supersymmetries (so 
defining an identity structure) which are not simply flat space.  

It is interesting to note that 
particular examples of these general types of solutions have already
appeared in the literature. Examples of -structure in  and
 in  were considered in  using
conformally Eguchi-Hanson metrics. Similar solutions related to
D3-branes were considered in. 

We should also note that  geometries of the type
discussed here with two flat directions are similar to those studied in 
. However, the motivation of that work
was rather different. Namely, the idea was to exploit
the fibration structure in order to construct examples of manifolds 
with  structures in six-dimensions of the type described in the 
last section.




Explicit examples I 



We now present explicit solutions of the type described in the last
section. For illustration we shall consider here just a single
flat direction fibred over a base-manifold . Additional examples
with two flat directions fibred over a four-dimensional base will be
considered in section . To begin with we consider
 to be four-dimensional, and the three complex structures are
taken to be self-dual.  As noted in section ,  is
necessarily conformally hyper-Kahler. The five-dimensional 
geometry thus takes the form

 

where  is an Abelian anti-self-dual instanton and
 is the volume form on .
Generically, these solutions preserve 1/2 of the  supersymmetries,
and none of the  supersymmetries for the type II theories, 
corresponding to eight supercharges for both the heterotic and the
type II theories. For solutions, we must impose the Bianchi identity
for . This gives 

 

Recall that supersymmetry implies that  is also an anti-self-dual
instanton on the base. In the special case that
, satisfying the Bianchi identity then implies that
the leading equations of motion are automatically
satisfied. Otherwise, one must separately check that one has a
solution of the equations of motion, including at this order 
corrections.  

Particular solutions can be found whenever we have an explicit
anti-self-dual Abelian instanton  on a hyper-Ka hler manifold. The
simplest cases are when the hyper-Kahler metric is flat. Let us present
some examples just for the type II case, for simplicity, where the 
Bianchi identity becomes

 

Then a simple anti-self-dual instantons is given for instance by 
   B=(x^1 x^2-x^3 x^4),
corresponding to a constant field-strength. A radial solution for the
dilaton is given by 
   ^2  = 1+m r^2  - 1 4 ^2 r^2 .
A different radial solution can be obtained by writing the flat
metric in terms of left-invariant one-forms on the three-sphere:
   s^2 = r^2 
      + 1 4 r^2( 
         (^1_R)^2 + (^2_R)^2+ (^3_R)^2 )
with positive orientation given by 
 (our conventions are as in).
A singular anti-self-dual instanton is then given by
B= 4r^2 ^3_R .
A radial solution for the dilaton is 
^2 =1+m r^2  -^2 12 r^6  .
When the hyper-Kahler metric is Eguchi-Hanson space or Taub-NUT
space any of the anti-self-dual harmonic two-forms on these spaces can
be used as the Abelian instanton and if they are normalisable they
lead to non-singular solutions. These cases have already appeared in
the literature . 

Let us now consider whether we can obtain compact heterotic
solutions of the form  explictd=5ex . (Recall that there are no
compact solutions with flux for the type II cases, since , by
the no-go theorem.) The base space
 must admit a hyper-Kahler metric so is either  or
. In addition, we will compactify the fibre direction on a circle 
of radius . By construction such a background preserves eight 
supersymmetries. For a solution we must also satisfy the Bianchi
identity. The left-hand side of HBI  is exact, thus the sum of
the sources on the right-hand side must be trivial in
cohomology. Since the manifold is compact, each of the sources is
also quantised, being some multiple of the first Pontrjagin 
 class (instanton charge) of the corresponding
bundle. If  is the bundle describing the  fibration and 
the bundle of the heterotic/type I gauge fields we have 

 

in cohomology. Note that given the definition of  the field strength
entering  is  hence the factor of  in the first
term. Since both  and  are anti-self-dual instantons on the base
 cannot cancel against  and we can only
satisfy quant  by including non-trivial . The equation
for the dilaton on  then becomes,  

 

One would then have to check whether such a solution for  in
fact leads to a background satisfying the full (higher-order)
equations for motion. One important point to note is that
satisfying quant  with non-vanishing  requires
. In other words the size of the the  fibre must be
of order the string scale. As such the supergravity description of
these compactifications is breaking down. (Note, in addition, that
 is constrained to be a rational multiple of , so cannot
be a modulus.) It would be interesting to find a corresponding
conformal field theory description, for instance by taking the
orbifold limit of the base  manifold. Note that it is trivial to
extend these solutions to six-dimensional compactifications with
 supersymmetry simply by including a second fibred
direction.  



Now let us consider solutions where the base geometry  is in more 
than four dimensions. Specifically we consider solutions where 
is conformal to a special holonomy manifold. We noted in
section  that this rules out the -cases for
. Let us thus consider  to be conformal to a
-holonomy manifold. An eight dimensional geometry preserving two
 supersymmetries, one of each  chirality, is given by

 

where  is an Abelian -instanton on the -holonomy
manifold . A type II solution is then obtained by solving
the Bianchi identity which reads 
   * _[mnp  ^q
      _l] _q^  = 3G_[mn  G_pl]  .
Given that  is a -instanton, this is equivalent to
dilat 
   _m  _n^= 
      -2G_m  ^kG_nk + 1 4 G^2 g_mn  . 
To get explicit solutions we need explicit -holonomy metrics
 and explicit Abelian instantons . One approach is
to note the if the -holonomy metric admits a Killing vector ,
then the two-form  is a -instanton if and only if 
preserves the -structure: . Since
all of the known explicit -manifolds have many isometries, this
result allows one in principle to find new solutions and would be
interesting to investigate further.  

If the -holonomy manifold is flat, solutions with constant flux
can be obtained as follows. We take 

 

giving constant field strength . This is an  Abelian
instanton provided
. In other
words, using a suitable projection, we have in general

 

for an arbitrary constant two-form . 
We then find that 

 

solves dilat .




Geometries with both  and  Killing spinors 



Let us now turn our attention to the type II cases summarised in
table . These geometries preserve both  and 
Killing spinors and thus define two different structures, , one
for each set of Killing spinors, of the type described in
section . Taking both sets together defines a
-structure where  is the maximal common subgroup of  and
 given their particular embeddings in . One can follow
the detailed strategy of  to derive the
necessary and sufficient conditions on this -structure in order
that the geometry preserves the corresponding supersymmetry. This is
based on direct manipulations of the Killing spinor equations and some
details of this approach appear in . 

Equivalently, we can obtain the conditions on the -structure
by writing the -structures in terms of the -structure and
then imposing the conditions on the -structures derived in
section .  In implementing this strategy it is crucial
to recall that the signs presented in section  assumed 
that the preserved spinors were of the -type
and also took, in the relevant cases, the preserved spinors to have a
definite chirality. In order to get the results of this section, one
needs the appropriate generalisations for  and sometimes 
the opposite chirality.

-geometries in  
This case arises when both  have  holonomy with a
common  subgroup. The  structure in  is specified
by a two-form , a complex two-form  and two one-forms 
with . They satisfy SUn  for  and in addition  

 

The corresponding  structures associated with  are
given by 

 


Demanding that the -structures each satisfy the necessary and 
sufficient conditions for supersymmetry discussed in SUncond , sunflux 
(with appropriate sign changes for , as mentioned above)
leads to necessary and sufficient conditions on the  structure.
Specifically, we find

 

with the flux given by 

 

These geometries
preserve two complex chiral  spinors, one  and
one .

They also possess an  almost product structure

 

where  is the vector field dual to the one-form , 
satisfying . Since  this
structure is integrable and hence the metric can be cast in the
canonical form 

 

The conditions 2SU3cond  then imply that at fixed ,
the  structure on the four-manifold has  and
. Such geometries, which in particular are ,
are called almost Calabi-Yau.

This case corresponds to fivebranes wrapping in .
This is mirrored in the expression for the flux 2SU3H , and
also in the structure of the metric fourtwometric  with
the  directions corresponding to the two directions transverse to
the fivebrane and the initial .
Explicit examples of such solutions were presented in 
 (see for further
discussion) and were further explored from the world-sheet point of
view in. 


-geometries in  
This case arises when  each have  holonomy and was
discussed in . The  structure in  is
specified by  and  satisfying SUn  for , and a vector
 such that  

) 

The two  structures are given by

 

and demanding that they satisfy  G2cond , G2flux  (and their
generalisation for ) 
leads to the differential conditions

 

with the flux given by 

 

These geometries preserve
two  spinors, one  and one .
The obvious almost product structure is again integrable 
and hence the metric can be cast in the canonical form

 

The six-dimensional slices at fixed 
have an  structure with intrinsic torsion lying in
, and  
it is straightforward to see
that . Recall that for  the module
 splits into two modules . The third
condition in 2G2cond  implies that while  vanishes 
 does not. These geometries are not Hermitian, as noted
in.
This case corresponds to fivebranes wrapping SLAG three-cycles and
explicit solutions were given in.

-geometries in  
This is one of the cases when  each have 
holonomy. It is in fact very similar to the case
of an  structure in  considered above.
The  structure in  is specified by  satisfying
SUn  for  and two vectors  satisfying 2SU3 . 
The two  structures are given by

 

Demanding that they satisfy the necessary and sufficient conditions for 
structures given in SUncond , sunflux  (and their generalisation for )
leads to the differential conditions as in 2SU3cond 

with the flux given by 

 

Such geometries preserve two pairs of  spinors with opposite chirality, two
 and two .
Again there is an integrable product structure and
the metric can be written in the form 

 

At fixed , the  structure on the six-manifold is
almost Calabi-Yau, with the only non-vanishing class being .
This case corresponds to fivebranes wrapping in 
and solutions were found in.


-geometries in  
The second way that  both have  holonomy is when they
give a common  structure. The
two orthogonal  structures  and
 satisfy the conditions 2SU2struc . 
The two -structures are given by
J^&=&J^3J' ^3^&=&where e.g. .
Demanding that they satisfy the necessary and sufficient conditions for 
structures given in SUncond , sunflux  (and their generalisation
for ) leads to the necessary and sufficient conditions on
the  structure 
given by

 

where e.g. .
These geometries preserve four
 spinors with the same chirality, two  and two .
The almost product structure

 

is integrable(Note that the existence of a generic pair
   of integrable complex structures satisfying only  
does not guarantee that the almost product structure  is 
integrable. A concrete counter example is discussed in 
Appendix .) 
since ,  commute and  are integrable
(see Appendix ) and implies the canonical form of the metric 

 

each block being four-by-four. The four-dimensional slices each 
have an  structure, with  and   
at any point in their transverse directions. 
The flux is given by 

 
These geometries arise when a fivebrane wraps a two-cycle in one
Calabi-Yau two-fold and a second two-cycle in a second Calabi-Yau two-fold.


-geometries in  
This case arises when  has  holonomy while
 has  holonomy.
These correspond to fivebranes wrapping
C-LAG four-cycles in hyper-eight manifolds. Recall that these are
complex with respect to one complex structure and 
special Lagrangian with respect
to the remaining two. We have a  structure given by a
triplet of complex structures satisfying Spstruc .
The  structure is given by , where
 

and satisfies SUncond 
while the structure is defined by
 
which satisfies spincond  (with appropriate sign changes).
This leads to 
the conditions on the -structure given by

 

and flux given by

 


These geometries preserve three  spinors of the same chirality,
two   and one . Note that the conditions
imply that the two 16 's in each of  and  vanish. 
Moreover, the six independent Lee forms are given by 

 

It is worth emphasising that the intrinsic torsion of this
 structure is not totally anti-symmetric, and hence the geometry is not
HKT. It would be interesting to find explicit examples.


-geometries in  
This is the first case when  each have holonomy. 
It corresponds to fivebranes wrapping
SLAG four-cycles in . In this case we have an  structure
 satisfying
SUn  for .
The two structures are given by
 

and satisfy spincond  (with sign changes for )
leading to the conditions on the -structure

 

with flux given by

 

These geometries preserve two  spinors with the same chirality,
one  and one . The intrinsic torsion of the 
structure lies in , 
with , and so in particular the geometries are not
Hermitian. 


-geometries in   
This is the second case when  each have holonomy. 
It occurs when fivebranes wrap co-associative four-cycles in
 manifolds. In this case the two structures give rise to
a  structure with  as in g2form  and

 

The two structures are given by

 

and satisfy spincond  (and sign changes for )
leading to the necessary and sufficient
conditions

   (^- K)  &=& 0 , 

   (^- ) K &=& 0 , 

     * (i_K * ) K &=& 0 , 

     * (i_K * ) i_K * &=& 4 * ,

with flux given by

 

These geometries preserve one  and one
  spinor of opposite chirality.
The intrinsic torsion of the  structure lies in 
 with . This means one cannot introduce a
 Dolbeault cohomology . 


-geometries  
For completeness let us briefly mention the case corresponding to
the first entry in table . This case has 
two different  structures each satisfying
SUn  giving a trivial structure defined by four real  vectors. A
little calculation reveals that this case can always be put in the
canonical form 

 

which is just the transverse space to the simple fivebrane solution.

We conclude this section with two comments. First, considering either
set of  or  Killing spinors we see that the
geometries of this section are special cases of those appearing in
section . It is then clear, from the results of
section , that supersymmetric geometries in  can be
obtained by fibering an appropriate number of flat directions over the
geometries in this section. In order that the same amount of
supersymmetry is preserved, the fibrations are determined by Abelian
instantons that satisfy the generalised self-duality conditions for
both of the -structures. In other words they must satisfy the 
generalised self-duality conditions for the maximal common subgroup
. Note that in general the Bianchi identity for  may further
restrict which fibrations are possible. For instance in the cases
where both  and  have  holonomy, one can
show that  has no components transforming as a four-form under
 for the common -structure. As such,
there are in fact no solutions with non-trivial twisting.  


The second comment is to note that we have only considered structures
 that are orthogonal in the sense that preserved spinors 
and  are orthogonal, that is . In
fact, as we now show, this is a necessary condition for a non-trivial
solution to be supersymmetric. Take any two Killing spinors
 and . The vanishing of the gravitini
variations implies that 

 

The dilatino equation implies that for any gamma-matrix operator 
we have 

 

Taking  and using the upper sign, we conclude that

 

This is trivially satisfied if the -structures are orthogonal
since then . If the structures are not
orthogonal, we have some point where  is
non-zero and then by continuity there will be a neighbourhood in which
it is non-zero. In this neighbourhood we have
, for some constant
. 

However, the full set of spinors  necessarily define a
-structure and there always exists some  connection
 that preserves the -structure. (Note this connection
generically does not have totally antisymmetric torsion.) In
particular, we have . Thus in fact we have 
 implying  is
a constant. However, the equations of motion then imply that  is
constant.  We thus conclude that there are no supersymmetric solutions
with non-vanishing flux when the structures  are not orthogonal. 




Explicit examples II 



In this section, we present some further explicit solutions in ,
some preserving both  and  supersymmetries, for the type II
theories, including a solution that preserves the unusual fraction of
 supersymmetry. The basic solutions have two flat directions
fibred over a four dimensional base-space, with the fibration
being specified by two Abelian instantons on the base, and thus
generalise those discussed in section . 
We shall also discuss compact heterotic geometries 
in  preserving both eight and four supercharges. 

It will be convenient in this section to distinguish different
six-dimensional solutions by the number of preserved
supersymmetries. Let us start with the most supersymmetric case
corresponding to a flat NS five-brane as discussed at the end of
the last section. Recall that the  solution transverse to a
simple fivebrane flatNSmetric  preserves eight  spinors and
eight  spinors satisfying the projections

 

As previously noted  have  holonomy in
 with the maximal common subgroup
being the identity. We can trivially lift this 
to a six-dimensional solution by adding two extra flat
directions. This still preserves 16 supercharges corresponding to 
supersymmetry in the remaining four spacetime dimensions.

We now twist the two flat directions, as in section , with
two Abelian instantons, 

 

giving the dilaton equation

 

where  and now  are taken to be
self-dual  () instantons on the  base space
. This twisting still preserves eight  spinors
so that  still has  holonomy. For non-zero ,
generically the solution however breaks all of the 
supersymmetry.(Note, simply for convenience of later discussion, 
we have exchanged the roles of  and
, by taking  and changing the orientation on the base,
as compared to the discussion in
section . There we took anti-self-dual instantons so that
 spinors where preserved. This accounts for the difference
in signs of the terms involving  and  in n=3  compared to
those in explictd=5ex ). Hence, generically these solutions
preserve  supersymmetry in the remaining four spacetime
dimensions. 

Interestingly, it is nonetheless possible to preserve four 
Killing spinors corresponding to  having  holonomy,
for suitably chosen non-generic instantons. To see this we define an
 structure 
by

 

where  and
 define the
 structure on . Demanding that the  structure
satisfies the conditions for supersymmetry SUncond , we find that

 

The generic constant flux solution to these equations is given by

 

for some complex constant . (Note, as we discuss below, this is the
same twisting that appears in the Iwasawa manifold analysed
in .)  The Bianchi identity then implies the equation
for the dilaton 

 

which can easily be solved. To summarise, the solution n=3  with flat base
space will
preserve eight  and four  spinors for the
specific choice of self-dual instantons spchoice  and dilaton
satisfying dileqhere . 

A number of comments are now in order. First, 
this special solution corresponds to  supersymmetry in the
remaining four spacetime dimensions. It would be interesting to relate
this solution to those discussed in . 

Secondly, the holonomy of the connections
 for the special solution are  and ,
respectively. This is not a combination appearing in
table . The form of the solution indicates that this
solution is related to fivebranes wrapping two flat directions, but a
world-volume interpretation of the twisting and preservation of
supersymmetry are obscure to us at present. 

Thirdly, this special background is also a
heterotic/type I solution. In this case, one loses the 
supersymmetries and the solution preserves only four 
spinors, and so has  supersymmetry in four-dimensions. Including
additional heterotic instantons simply add to the source  in
the dilaton equation dileqhere . Note that by taking  and
switching the orientation of the base, we
switch  and  and hence we can also
obtain a heterotic solution from the generic solution
n=3  with an  structure and
 superymmetry.

Finally, the metric and three-form obtained by setting the dilaton to
constant in n=3  with , were
first considered in the heterotic case (including an additional Abelian
instanton embedded in  or )
in . There it was demonstrated that the conditions for
the preservation of  supersymmetry with  having
 holonomy were satisfied. However, given the analysis here,
the background in is problematic for the following somewhat
subtle reason. As we have already noted when the dilaton is constant and
, the leading-order type II (or heterotic/type I) equations of
motion are not satisfied. As shown in , these
equations of motion are a direct consequence of the preservation of
supersymmetry once the Bianchi identity eq:BI1  is imposed (or
equivalently eq:BI2  if   as for the geometry 
considered in ). This contradiction is resolved by the
fact that the background in  actually satisfies a
Bianchi identity with the opposite sign to the one arising in type I
supergravity. This discrepancy is probably related to the sign
discrepancy between the expression strom  and the corresponding
expression in (Following recent
  correspondence the authors of  have independently
  confirmed this discrepancy in .) .

The type II solutions we have been discussing
can also be generalised by replacing the
flat space in n=3  with a generic Calabi-Yau two-fold . 
As usual for type II, the Calabi-Yau two-fold cannot be compact
in order to satisfy the Bianchi identity . If
we take the orientation of the  to be such that the complex
structures are self-dual, we impose the projections
. In this case, the solution
preserves no   supersymmetry, and generically no 
supersymmetry. However, choosing 
, where  is the
holomorphic  form on , we find that  has
 holonomy and the solution still preserves four 
supersymmetries, corresponding to  supersymmetry in four
dimensions.  Alternatively, if the orientation of the  is chosen
so that the complex structures are anti-self-dual, we impose the
projections . These solutions break
all of the  supersymmetry, but preserve eight  spinors. The
latter choice of orientation corresponds (after exchanging  with
 by taking  and switching the orientation on the base) 
to a simple generalisation from  to
 of the solutions discussed in section  and
explicitly obtained 
in  for the cases of Taub-NUT and Eguchi-Hanson. The
former choice of orientation on the other hand, gives a new kind of
supersymmetric solution that exploits the fact that one is twisting
two flat directions and not just one as considered
in .

Similarly, one can obtain heterotic/type I geometries preserving
 supersymmetry. By taking the flat directions to be a
two-torus, and  to to be either conformally  or conformally
, we get compact and supersymmetric heterotic geometries. It will
be interesting to see whether it is possible to solve the heterotic
Bianchi identity for these geometries; if it is, as in
section , the  contribution will be
essential. In addition, one should again find that the radius of the
two-torus is required to be of order the string scale and that several
of the moduli are fixed. 


Discussion 

In this paper we have studied the necessary and sufficient conditions
for static geometries of type I/heterotic string theory, or type
II theories with only non-vanishing NS-NS fields, to preserve supersymmetry
and solve the equations of motion. The Killing spinors define 
-structures on the geometries
and we determined the intrinsic torsion of the -structure. 
We emphasised the universal expression for the three-form flux in 
terms of generalised calibrations and the connection with
wrapped branes, following.
This universal expression for the flux leads to
a very simple proof of a vanishing theorem on compact 
manifolds.

The geometries always have a connection with totally anti-symmetric torsion, 
 (or  for the type II theories),
which has special holonomy. We first discussed the geometries
in the canonical dimension for the special holonomy group, 
for ,  for , etc. We then showed that the most general
geometries in  have a number of flat directions fibred over these
geometries in the canonical dimensions, with the fibration being determined
by Abelian generalised instantons.
We also discussed the
physical interpretation of these geometries in terms of wrapped
fivebranes. For example, the eight-dimensional
geometries with a single flat dimension 
fibred over a seven-dimensional geometry with -structure
correspond to fivebranes wrapping supersymmetric cycles of the 
form  where 
 is an associative three-cycle in a -holonomy manifold. The fact
that the resulting eight-dimensional
geometry is not necessarily a direct product of  with a seven-dimensional
geometry is worth further investigation.
We presented some explicit examples, that would be worth studying
further and generalising.

These results provide a comprehensive classification
of all of the supersymmetric static geometries
of the heterotic/type I theory. For the type II theories, 
we also analysed the geometries that arise when both
connections  have special holonomy. Our analysis
covers all cases of NS fivebranes wrapping calibrated cycles, as listed
in tables  and . 

We also presented an explicit solution with a torus  fibred over
an  base with  having  holonomy and
 having  holonomy. This solution has 
four  Killing spinors and eight  spinors. The form of the
flux suggests that the solution should be interpreted as a flat fivebrane
with two of the world-volume directions further wrapped on the
two torus. Naively, one would therefore expect 8 plus 8  Killing spinors
and it would also be interesting to find a physical interpretation of the
twisting which leads to this reduction of supersymmetry. In
 type II solutions on  orientifolds with
non-vanishing R-R and NS-NS fluxes were presented that also preserve
12 Killing spinors and it would be interesting to see if they are
related. Perhaps our solutions provide a local descriptions of blow-ups
of geometries around certain fixed points. 

Candidate heterotic compactifications in  were also presented,
preserving both four and eight supersymmetries. They are based on
manifolds which are fibrations of  over a  base. The models
with four supersymmetries arise for non-generic complex structure on
the  and there are additional constraints on the radii of the
circles of the torus. This indicates that many moduli are fixed. We
showed that the size of the torus is necessarily of order the string
scale, indicating that the supergravity approximation is breaking
down. One would also has to check the equations for motion are satisfied. To
pursue these models further we aim to construct a conformal
field theory description. It would also be interesting to relate our
compactifications to those of . 

We have emphasised that the expression for the three-form flux
is easy to understand as a generalised calibration since the geometry
should still admit fivebranes wrapping the corresponding cycles. It is
very interesting to note that many, and in some cases all, of the other
conditions constraining the intrinsic torsion can be interpreted in
the same way. For example, consider the case of the  structure
with only  Killing spinors. The expression for the
flux sunflux  is the general calibration condition for a
fivebrane wrapping a Kahler two-cycle in a 
Calabi-Yau three-fold. In addition the intrinsic torsion is constrained
to satisfy SUncond . Suppose we consider the trivial product of
our  manifold  with a torus . Let 
and  represent the extra directions. The full set of
conditions on the structure can then be written on the
eight-dimensional space  as  

 

Given that  lies solely in , we see that all three expressions
are calibration conditions of the form
 just for wrapping different
cycles. The first is for a fivebrane wrapping a Kahler four-cycle in
the Calabi-Yau, the second for wrapping a special Lagrangian cycle
(and one of the  directions), while the last is the familiar
expression for the wrapping of a Kahler two-cycle in the Calabi-Yau
together with the torus . This is physically reasonable, since
the geometry , 
corresponding to the full backreaction solution around a
brane wrapping a Kahler two-cycle, should still admit probe branes
wrapping the special Lagrangian three- and Kahler
four-cycles. Similar arguments extend to the fibration cases in
section  and the geometries with  and
 in section . 

An important motivation for this work is that a good understanding of
the geometry underlying supergravity configurations might allow
us to find new explicit solutions. Indeed for the cases listed in 
table a co-homogeneity one ansatz is useful for finding solutions 
. This is a practical alternative to finding
solutions describing wrapped fivebranes
using the gauge supergravity approach initiated in.
For the cases in table , on the other hand, 
a simple generalisation of this technique can lead to co-homogeneity one
but also to a co-homogeneity two or more ansatz, and progress in
the latter case is much more difficult. 
At present the gauge supergravity approach
is the best available tool to produce solutions for these latter cases. 
It should be noted, however, that since the configurations in 
table  preserve more supersymmetry than those in table ,
one expects that with new techniques, ultimately, they could 
be easier to analyse. Using the techniques developed in
this paper some explicit solutions are presented in.

Finally, it is natural to generalise this work to also include RR fields
in the type II theories, as well as to consider Lorentzian
geometries. Such geometries will allow one to describe both wrapped NS
and D-branes, as well pp-waves and general non-static backgrounds. 
Based on this work and on 
 we expect generalised calibrations to play an important role.

Acknowledgments 
We would like to thank Atish Dabholkar, 
Jan Gutowski and James Sparks for useful discussions.
D. M.  is supported by an EC Marie Curie Individual Fellowship under contract 
number HPMF-CT-2002-01539. D. W. is supported by a Royal Society
University Research Fellowship. 




Equations of motion 

The low-energy effective action for heterotic/type I string theory is
given by the type I supergravity action
acthere 
S=1 2^2 d^10  x -g 
e^-2  (R+4()^2-1 12 H^2 - F^2) 

where  is in the adjoint of  or . 
In type I supergravity the three-form  satisfies a modified
Bianchi identity

H=2FF .
Including the leading order string correction from anomaly cancellation
we get

H=2(FF -RR)
but to fully consistently implement this one should
also include modifications to the
action and also to the supersymmetry variations. 
The equations of motion coming from acthere  
are given by 

 
 

The action and equations of motion for the type II theories with
all RR fields set to zero are obtained by simply setting the gauge
field  to zero and using the Bianchi identity .




Spinor and -structure conventions 



In doing calculations it is often useful to have an explicit set of
projections defining the Killing spinors and the corresponding
-structures. Here we define one possible set of conventions
consistent with the expressions given in the paper. In particular, we
will use the same set of projectors (or subset of them) to define the
invariant spinors in all cases. Specifically, the Killing spinors will
be defined by their  eigenvalues for the set of commuting gamma
matrices  

 

We concentrate on the cases of -structure in canonical
dimension. However, in each case we also give how the structure embeds
in the next simplest structure group following figure . Using
these embeddings one can obtain conventions for any of the
-structures in arbitrary dimensions . 

Note that in all dimensions the gamma matrix algebra is taken to be
 and the adjoint spinor is written
as  and the conjugate spinor as . We
always normalise the Killing spinors to satisfy
. 

  
In eight dimensions, a -structure defines a single real
chiral invariant spinor . For definiteness, we choose
. A possible set of independent, 
commuting projections defining a  are 

 

Writing the Cayley four-form  as

 

then matches the expression Psidef . The corresponding volume
form is given by 

 

Note one can always choose a real basis for the gamma matrices so that
. The conventions for lifting a
-structure to  are given in section .


 
An -structure leaves invariant two real orthogonal spinors
 with  of the same chirality in . These
can be defined by  

 

with 

 

Defining a complex spinor
, the forms
 and  can then be written as 

 

Note in the basis where , we have the
more  familiar expressions  and
. 
Given  we get the standard
expressions 

 

The corresponding volume form is given by d8vol  as above. Note
that each real spinor  also defines a corresponding 
-structure as in spin7s  given by  

 

  

 
We now have three real orthogonal invariant spinors 
with  of the same chirality in . These can be defined by  

 

with 

 

Note, the eigenvalues under  of
 are ,  and  for 
respectively. The three two-forms  are then given by 

 

Given
, 
,
and
,  
we have the explicit expressions

 

The corresponding volume form is given by d8vol  as above. 
Note that each almost complex structure  as a -structure
has a corresponding -form  given by 

 

Each spinor  also defines a corresponding
-structure given by 

 


 
We now have four orthogonal, real invariant spinors all of the same
chirality in . They can be defined by 

 

with 

 

The three two-forms  are given by combinations, self-dual on
the  index,

 

The second set of  two-forms are given by the corresponding
anti-self-dual combinations with minus signs between the first and
second terms in parentheses. Given
, 
,
and
,  
together with 
, 
,
and
,  
we have the explicit expressions

 

Again, the corresponding volume form is given by d8vol  as
above. Note there are six -structures given by 
 and similarly each spinor  defines a
corresponding -structure given by 

 



  A -structure defines a single invariant spinor
in . This can be defined by the projections

 

where we have taken . The associative
three-form g2form  is then given by  

 

The corresponding volume form is given by 

 

Note the relation between  and  is slightly
non-standard. It is the opposite to the conventions given, for
instance in . To match the expressions in ,
one replaces  with  and permutes the new basis
 to . Note that one can choose an
imaginary basis for the -matrices where
. 

Lifting to , the -structure defines a pair of real spinors
 with  satisfying G2projs  of opposite
chirality. They can be distinguished by

 

The -structure is defined by  and  given by 

 

With , we have  and
 takes the standard form g2form . The corresponding
volume form  is given by 

 

The two -structures defined by  are given by 

 

Note with these conventions,  where  is
the usual coassociative four-form, that is the Hodge dual of  on
the seven-dimensional subspace orthogonal to . 


  The -structure defines a single chiral
complex spinor . This can be defined by the conditions

 

We choose the chirality  so
that . The forms  and  are
then given by    

 

Given , we get the standard
expressions 

 

The corresponding volume form is 

 

Again one can always choose a basis where
 and .  

Lifting to , the -structure defines a pair of invariant
spinors  with 
satisfying SU3projs . Fixing , they
can be distinguished by 

 

The -structure is given by 

 

Given , this gives 
and  and  take the standard form JOform . The corresponding
volume form  is given by 

 

The two -structures defined by  are given by 

 



  Finally for  the structure again defines a
single complex spinor of definite chirality. We take the negative
chirality 

 

The forms  and  are then given by 

 

Given  and
 we get the self-dual combinations

 

The corresponding volume form is 

 

Again one can always choose a basis where
 and .

Lifting to , the -structure defines a pair of complex
invariant spinors  with 
satisfying SU3projs . These have opposite chirality and can be
distinguished by  

 

The -structure is given by 

 

Given  and 
 while  
 and
, we have ,
 and  and  take the standard
form JOform2 . The corresponding volume form
 is given by  

 

The two -structures defined by  are given by 

 





Almost product structures 



An almost complex structure is a -structure on a 
-dimensional 
manifold,
which is characterised by a tensor  satisfying
. Using this one can split the tangent space 
at any point in the two subspaces  corresponding 
to the  and  eigenvalues of  respectively.
The Nijenhuis tensor for the almost complex structure is defined by
N_mn ^r  & = & J_m^s   _[s  J_n] ^r -
J_n^s  _[s  J_m] ^r  .
The almost complex structure is integrable if and only if
the Nijenhuis tensor vanishes and in this case one can 
introduce holomorphic co-ordinates on the manifold. 
If  is compatible with a metric,
namely  is a two-form, then the
metric is called almost Hermitian and Hermitian if  is integrable.


Similarly, an almost product structure is a 
-structure on a -dimensional manifold, which is
characterised by a tensor  satisfying
. At any point the tangent space splits accordingly as
, where  (respectively ) is the 
number
of  (respectively ) eigenvalues of .
The Nijenhuis tensor for the almost product structure is defined again by
N_mn ^r  & = & _m^s   _[s  
_n] ^r -
_n^s  _[s  _m] ^r  
and the almost product structure is integrable if and only if
the Nijenhuis tensor vanishes (see e.g.). If furthermore 
the almost product structure is metric compatible, i.e. 
 is a symmetric tensor, 
one can introduce "separating co-ordinates" on the manifold such that the 
metric 
takes the  block-diagonal form 
s^2 & = & g^P_ij (x,y) x^i  x^j  
+ g^Q_ab (x,y) y^a y^b  
where  and .


Two commuting almost complex structures , satisfying
 give rise to an almost product
structure
defalps 
J' .
Suppose  and  are metric compatible and satisfy 
, or ,
where  is a metric connection with totally
anti-symmetric torsion . The Nijenhuis tensor then
reads in general   
N_mn ^r  = 1 2  (H_mn ^r +
_m ^p _n ^q H_pq ^r   - ^rp _m ^q H_pqn -
_n ^p^rq  H_pqm )  .
Using the tangent space decomposition, one finds that the only non-zero 
components are given by
N_ij ^ c  &=& 2 H_ij ^ c N_ab ^ k  &=& 2 H_ab ^ k  . 
If instead we assume that ,  are commuting and are both integrable,
and also , then all the components of 
 vanish, hence  is integrable . To see
this we first note that given the assumptions,  is a 
form with respect to either complex structure :
 
To proceed, write  to get
2_m _n ^p=
J^+_n ^r J^-sp H_mrs 
-J^-_n ^r J^+sp H_mrs 
Then using twoone  we find
4_[m _n]  ^p=
-J^+_m ^rJ^+_n ^sH_rst ^tp 
+J^-_m ^rJ^-_n ^sH_rst ^tp 
from which it easily follows that .

It is sometimes incorrectly stated in the literature that 
, defined by  defalps , is integrable if and only if
the two commuting almost complex structures are integrable. A concrete
counter-example is provided by the geometry n=3  for generic
instantons .
This geometry has an  structure, built from the  Killing
spinors, which can be specified by two  structures.
The corresponding two almost complex structures, written as two-forms, 
are given by

 

Both almost complex structures are integrable.  
A quick way to see this
is to note that the geometry is a special example of the canonical 
geometry in   (preserving twice as much supersymmetry) 
that was  discussed in section  (with expressions for
 spinors rather than  spinors that we have here)
for either  structure. In particular, as pointed out 
in section 3, the almost complex structures are integrable. 
Moreover, the two complex structures clearly commute and thus
define an almost product structure given by
. 
On the other hand, because  and hence
, from nonzeronij 
we see that there are non-zero components of the associated 
Nijenhuis tensor, namely

 






 99 



S. Sethi, C. Vafa and E. Witten,
"Constraints on low-dimensional string compactifications,"
Nucl. Phys. B 480  (1996) 213
hep-th/9606122.


D. Martelli, to appear.

A. Strominger,
"Superstrings With Torsion,"
Nucl. Phys. B 274  (1986) 253.


C. M. Hull, "Superstring Compactifications With Torsion And
Space-Time Supersymmetry," in Turin 1985, Proceedings,
Superunification and Extra Dimensions , 347-375; 
"Compactifications Of The Heterotic Superstring,"
Phys. Lett. B 178  (1986) 357.


B. de Wit, D. J. Smit and N. D. Hari Dass,
"Residual Supersymmetry Of Compactified D = 10 Supergravity,"
Nucl. Phys. B 283  (1987) 165.


J. P. Gauntlett, D. Martelli, S. Pakis and D. Waldram,
"-structures and wrapped NS5-branes,"
hep-th/0205050.


S. Salamon, "Riemannian Geometry and Holonomy Groups," Vol. 201 of
Pitman Research Notes in Mathematics, Longman, Harlow, 1989. 

J. P. Gauntlett, N. Kim, D. Martelli and D. Waldram,
"Fivebranes wrapped on SLAG three-cycles and related geometry,"
JHEP 0111  (2001) 018
hep-th/0110034.


T. Friedrich and S. Ivanov,
"Parallel spinors and connections with skew-symmetric torsion in
string  theory," 
math.dg/0102142.


T. Friedrich and S. Ivanov,
"Killing spinor equations in dimension 7 and geometry of integrable 
-manifolds,"
math.dg/0112201.


S. Ivanov, "Connection with torsion, parallel spinors and
geometry of Spin(7) manifolds," 
math.dg/0111216.


J. P. Gauntlett, J. B. Gutowski, C. M. Hull, S. Pakis and H. S. Reall,
"All supersymmetric solutions of minimal supergravity in five  dimensions,"
hep-th/0209114.


S. Gurrieri, J. Louis, A. Micu and D. Waldram,
"Mirror Symmetry in Generalized Calabi-Yau Compactifications,"
hep-th/0211102.


J. P. Gauntlett, S. Pakis,
"The Geometry of D=11 Killing Spinors,"
hep-th/0212008.


P. Kaste, R. Minasian, M. Petrini and A. Tomasiello,
"Nontrivial RR two-form field strength and SU(3)-structure,"
hep-th/0301063;

"Kaluza-Klein bundles and manifolds of exceptional holonomy,"
JHEP 0209  (2002) 033
hep-th/0206213.


K. Behrndt and C. Jeschek,
"Fluxes in M-theory on 7-manifolds and G structures,"
hep-th/0302047.


G. L. Cardoso, G. Curio, G. Dall'Agata, 
D. Lust, P. Manousselis and G. Zoupanos,
"Non-Kaehler String Backgrounds and their Five Torsion Classes,"
hep-th/0211118.


J. Gutowski and G. Papadopoulos, "AdS calibrations," Phys.
Lett. B 462  (1999) 81 
hep-th/9902034.


J. Gutowski, G. Papadopoulos and P. K. Townsend, "Supersymmetry
and generalized calibrations," Phys. Rev. D 60  (1999)
106006 
hep-th/9905156.


S. Ivanov and G. Papadopoulos, "A no-go theorem for string warped
compactifications," Phys. Lett. B 497  (2001) 309
hep-th/0008232.


G. Papadopoulos,
"Brane solitons and hypercomplex structures,"
math.dg/0003024.


A. R. Frey and J. Polchinski,
" warped compactifications,"
Phys. Rev. D 65  (2002) 126009
hep-th/0201029.


J. M. Maldacena and C. Nunez,
"Supergravity description of field theories on curved manifolds and a
no  go theorem," 
Int. J. Mod. Phys. A 16  (2001) 822
hep-th/0007018.


A. Gray, L. M. Hervella,
"The Sixteen Classes of Almost Hermitian Manifolds and Their Linear
Invariants,"  Ann. Mat. Pura. e Appl. 282  (1980), 1-21.

S. Chiossi and S. Salamon,
"The intrinsic torsion of  and  structures,"
math.dg/0202282 

M. Fernandez,
"A classification of Riemannian manifolds with structure group Spin(7),"
Ann. Mat. Pura. Appl. 143  (1982), 101-122

M. Fernandez, A. Gray, "Riemannian Manifolds with Structure
Group ,"  Ann. Mat. Pura. e Appl. 32  (1982), 19-45.

M. Fernandez and L. Ugarte,
"Dolbeault cohomology for -manifolds,
Geom. Dedicata, 70  (1998) 57.

P. Gauduchon and P.Tod,
"Hyperhermitian metrics with symmetry", J. Geom. Phys. 25  (1998) 291.

S. Ivanov,
"Geometry of quaternionic Kaehler connections with torsion,"
J. Geom. Phys.  41  (2002) 235
math.dg/0003214.


J. A. Harvey and A. Strominger,
"Octonionic Superstring Solitons,"
Phys. Rev. Lett.  66  (1991) 549.


M. Gunaydin and H. Nicolai,
"Seven-dimensional octonionic Yang-Mills instanton and its extension to an heterotic string soliton,"
Phys. Lett. B 351  (1995) 169
[Addendum-ibid. B 376  (1996) 329]
hep-th/9502009.



H. Lu and J. F. Vazquez-Poritz,
"Resolution of overlapping branes,"
Phys. Lett. B 534  (2002) 155
hep-th/0202075.



H. Lu and J. F. Vazquez-Poritz,
"S(1)-wrapped D3-branes on conifolds,"
Nucl. Phys. B 633  (2002) 114
hep-th/0202175.



E. Goldstein and S. Prokushkin,
"Geometric model for complex non-Kaehler manifolds with SU(3) structure,"
hep-th/0212307.


K. Hori and A. Kapustin,
"Worldsheet descriptions of wrapped NS five-branes,"
hep-th/0203147.


M. Naka,
"Various wrapped branes from gauged supergravities,"
hep-th/0206141.



J. M. Maldacena and C. Nunez,
"Towards the large  limit of pure  super Yang Mills,"
Phys. Rev. Lett.  86  (2001) 588
hep-th/0008001.



G. Papadopoulos and A. A. Tseytlin,
"Complex geometry of conifolds and 5-brane wrapped on 2-sphere,"
Class. Quant. Grav.  18  (2001) 1333
hep-th/0012034.



B. S. Acharya, J. P. Gauntlett and N. Kim,
"Fivebranes wrapped on associative three-cycles,"
Phys. Rev. D 63  (2001) 106003
hep-th/0011190.



J. M. Maldacena and H. Nastase,
"The supergravity dual of a theory with dynamical supersymmetry  breaking,"
JHEP 0109  (2001) 024
hep-th/0105049.


G. Grantcharov, Y. S. Poon,
"Geometry of Hyper-Kahler Connections with Torsion",
Commun.Math.Phys. 213 (2000) 19-37, 
math.DG/9908015.

J. Dadok, F.R. Harvey and F. Morgan,
"Calibrations on ," Trans. Am. Math. Soc.
307  (1988) 1.
    

J. P. Gauntlett, G. W. Gibbons, G. Papadopoulos and P. K. Townsend,
"Hyper-Kaehler manifolds and multiply intersecting branes,"
Nucl. Phys. B 500  (1997) 133
hep-th/9702202.


R. S. Ward,
"Completely Solvable Gauge Field Equations In Dimension Greater Than Four,"
Nucl. Phys. B 236  (1984) 381.


J. P. Gauntlett, N. Kim, D. Martelli and D. Waldram,
"Wrapped fivebranes and  super Yang-Mills theory,"
Phys. Rev. D 64  (2001) 106008
hep-th/0106117.


F. Bigazzi, A. L. Cotrone and A. Zaffaroni,
" gauge theories from wrapped five-branes,"
Phys. Lett. B 519  (2001) 269
hep-th/0106160.

J. Gomis and J. G. Russo,
"  Yang-Mills theory from wrapped branes,"
JHEP 0110  (2001) 028
hep-th/0109177.


K. Becker and K. Dasgupta,
"Heterotic strings with torsion,"
JHEP 0211  (2002) 006
hep-th/0209077.


P. K. Tripathy and S. P. Trivedi,
"Compactification with flux on K3 and tori,"
hep-th/0301139.


K. Becker, M. Becker, K. Dasgupta and P. S. Green,
"Compactifications of heterotic theory on non-Kaehler complex manifolds.  I,"
hep-th/0301161.


D.D. Joyce, Compact Manifolds with Special Holonomy , Oxford
Mathematical Monographs, Oxford University Press, 2000.

K. Yano, "Differential geometry on complex and almost complex spaces,"
Macmillan, New York, 1965.

S. J. Gates, C. M. Hull and M. Rocek,
"Twisted Multiplets And New Supersymmetric Nonlinear Sigma Models,"
Nucl. Phys. B 248  (1984) 157.










